Hawaii statutes.
[§261-27] Kawaihapai Airfield. The
official name of the airfield located at Kawaihapai, formerly known as
Dillingham Airfield, shall be Kawaihapai Airfield. [L 2001, c 276, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next